http://fire.pppl.gov/fusac_2001_color.pdf

   An Assessment of the Department of Energy's Office of Fusion Energy
   Sciences Program NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL An Assessment of the
   Department of Energy's Office of Fusion Energy Sciences Program Fusion
   Science Assessment Committee Plasma Science Committee Board on Physics
   and Astronomy Division on Engineering and Physical Sciences National
   Research Council NATIONAL ACADEMY PRESS Washington, D.C. National
   Academy Press * 2101 Constitution Avenue, N.W. * Washington, DC 20418
   NOTICE: The project that is the subject of this report was approved by
   the Governing Board of the National Research Council, whose members are
   drawn from the councils of the National Academy of Sciences, the
   National Academy of Engineering, and the Institute of Medicine. The
   members of the committee responsible for the report were chosen for
   their special competences and with regard for appropriate balance. This
   project was supported by the Department of Energy under Grant No.
   DE-FG02-98ER54508. International Standard Book Number 0-309-07345-6
   Additional copies of this report are available from: National Academy
   Press, 2101 Constitution Avenue, N.W., Lockbox 285, Washington, DC
   20055; (800) 624-6242 or (202) 334-3313 (in the Washington metropolitan
   area); Internet /www.nap.edu>; and Board on Physics and Astronomy,
   National Research Council, HA 562, 2101 Constitution Avenue, N.W.,
   Washington, DC 20418; Internet /www.national-academies.org/bpa>. Cover
   images: The three images on the cover illustrate the commonality of
   fundamental processes, such as for magnetic reconnection in
   astrophysical and laboratory plasmas. The top image, soft x-ray data
   from the TRACE (Transition Region and Coronal Explorer) satellite,
   shows loops of million-degree plasma in the solar corona. The heating
   of plasma in these loops is believed to result from the release of
   magnetic energy during magnetic reconnection. The four plots in the
   center of the cover are a sequence of electron temperature measurements
   from the core of the Tokamak Fusion Test Reactor during an "internal
   disruption." The topological change in the magnetic field resulting
   from magnetic reconnection facilitates the expulsion of the 50-million-
   degree plasma core. In the bottom image, the Magnetic Reconnection
   Experiment explores the basic physics of magnetic reconnection.
   Superimposed is a snapshot of the measured magnetic field. Courtesy of
   NASA and the Stanford-Lockheed Institute for Space Research (top) and
   M. Yamada, Princeton Plasma Physics Laboratory (middle and bottom).
   Copyright 2001 by the National Academy of Sciences. All rights
   reserved. Printed in the United States of America National Academy of
   Sciences National Academy of Engineering Institute of Medicine National
   Research Council The National Academy of Sciences is a private,
   nonprofit, self-perpetuating society of distinguished scholars engaged
   in scientific and engineering research, dedicated to the furtherance of
   science and technology and to their use for the general welfare. Upon
   the authority of the charter granted to it by the Congress in 1863, the
   Academy has a mandate that requires it to advise the federal government
   on scientific and technical matters. Dr. Bruce M. Alberts is president
   of the National Academy of Sciences. The National Academy of
   Engineering was established in 1964, under the charter of the National
   Academy of Sciences, as a parallel organization of outstanding
   engineers. It is autonomous in its administration and in the selection
   of its members, sharing with the National Academy of Sciences the
   responsibility for advising the federal government. The National
   Academy of Engineering also sponsors engineering programs aimed at
   meeting national needs, encourages education and research, and
   recognizes the superior achievements of engineers. Dr. William A. Wulf
   is president of the National Academy of Engineering. The Institute of
   Medicine was established in 1970 by the National Academy of Sciences to
   secure the services of eminent members of appropriate professions in
   the examination of policy matters pertaining to the health of the
   public. The Institute acts under the responsibility given to the
   National Academy of Sciences by its congressional charter to be an
   adviser to the federal government and, upon its own initiative, to
   identify issues of medical care, research, and education. Dr. Kenneth
   I. Shine is president of the Institute of Medicine. The National
   Research Council was organized by the National Academy of Sciences in
   1916 to associate the broad commu- nity of science and technology with
   the Academy's purposes of furthering knowledge and advising the federal
   government. Functioning in accordance with general policies determined
   by the Academy, the Council has become the principal operating agency
   of both the National Academy of Sciences and the National Academy of
   Engineering in providing services to the government, the public, and
   the scientific and engineering communities. The Council is administered
   jointly by both Academies and the Institute of Medicine. Dr. Bruce M.
   Alberts and Dr. William A. Wulf are chairman and vice chairman,
   respectively, of the National Research Council. FUSION SCIENCE
   ASSESSMENT COMMITTEE CHARLES F. KENNEL, Scripps Institution of
   Oceanography, Chair* LINDA CAPUANO, Honeywell, Inc. PATRICK L.
   COLESTOCK, Los Alamos National Laboratory FRANCE CORDOVA, University of
   California at Santa Barbara* JAMES F. DRAKE, University of Maryland*
   NATHANIEL J. FISCH, Princeton University LENNARD FISK, University of
   Michigan RAYMOND FONCK, University of Wisconsin ROBERT A. FROSCH,
   Harvard University* GEORGE GLOECKLER, University of Maryland ZORAN
   MIKIC, Science Applications International Corporation ALBERT NARATH,
   Lockheed Martin Corporation (retired)* CLAUDIO PELLEGRINI, University
   of California at Los Angeles* STEWART C. PRAGER, University of
   Wisconsin at Madison* ROBERT ROSNER, University of Chicago* ANDREW M.
   SESSLER, Lawrence Berkeley Laboratory ROBERT H. SOCOLOW, Princeton
   University* JAMES W. VAN DAM, University of Texas at Austin JONATHAN
   WURTELE, University of California at Berkeley *Steering group member
   DONALD C. SHAPERO, Board on Physics and Astronomy, Director KEVIN D.
   AYLESWORTH, Program Officer (until October 15, 1999) JOEL R. PARRIOTT,
   Program Officer ACHILLES SPELIOTOPOULOS, Program Officer (after October
   20, 2000) v PLASMA SCIENCE COMMITTEE STEVEN C. COWLEY, University of
   California at Los Angeles, Chair JILL P. DAHLBURG, Naval Research
   Laboratory JAMES F. DRAKE, University of Maryland MARK J. KUSHNER,
   University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign JOHN D. LINDL, Lawrence
   Livermore National Laboratory DAVID MEYERHOFER, University of Rochester
   THOMAS M. O'NEIL, University of California at San Diego STEWART C.
   PRAGER, University of Wisconsin at Madison ROBERT ROSNER, University of
   Chicago JONATHAN WURTELE, University of California at Berkeley DONALD
   C. SHAPERO, Board on Physics and Astronomy, Director KEVIN D.
   AYLESWORTH, Program Officer (until October 15, 1999) JOEL R. PARRIOTT,
   Program Officer (from October 16, 1999, to July 15, 2000) ACHILLES
   SPELIOTOPOULOS, Program Officer (after July 15, 2000) vi BOARD ON
   PHYSICS AND ASTRONOMY JOHN P. HUCHRA, Harvard-Smithsonian Center for
   Astrophysics, Chair ROBERT C. RICHARDSON, Cornell University, Vice
   Chair GORDON A. BAYM, University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign
   WILLIAM BIALEK, NEC Research Institute VAL FITCH, Princeton University
   WENDY FREEDMAN, Carnegie Observatories RICHARD D. HAZELTINE, University
   of Texas at Austin KATHRYN LEVIN, University of Chicago CHUAN LIU,
   University of Maryland JOHN C. MATHER, NASA Goddard Space Flight Center
   CHERRY ANN MURRAY, Lucent Technologies JULIA PHILLIPS, Sandia National
   Laboratories ANNEILA I. SARGENT, California Institute of Technology
   JOSEPH H. TAYLOR, Jr., Princeton University KATHLEEN TAYLOR, General
   Motors Research and Development Center CARL E. WEIMAN, JILA/University
   of Colorado at Boulder PETER G. WOLYNES, University of California at
   San Diego DONALD C. SHAPERO, Director ROBERT L. RIEMER, Program Officer
   JOEL R. PARRIOTT, Program Officer ACHILLES SPELIOTOPOULOS, Program
   Officer SARAH CHOUDHURY, Senior Project Associate NELSON QUIÑONES,
   Project Assistant vii Preface The Fusion Science Assessment Committee
   was convened under the auspices of the National Research Council's
   Board on Physics and Astronomy in 1998 in response to a request to the
   National Research Council by the Department of Energy's Office of
   Science for an assessment of the scientific quality of its Office of
   Fusion Energy Sciences (OFES) program. The original charge to the
   committee was expanded in early 1999, after consultation with the asso-
   ciate director for OFES, to include a programmatic assessment in
   addition to the scientific assessment. The expanded charge to the
   committee is as follows: "The committee will assess the scientific
   quality of the fusion program of the DOE's Office of Science. Criteria
   will include excellence, impact, role in educa- tion, and contribution
   to strengthening the scientific foundation for fusion. A science
   strategy for the program will provide a context for judgement and a
   direction for future development." The committee was asked to look at
   OFES specifically, but in the course of its deliberations determined
   that it could not look at the OFES program in a meaningful way unless
   it considered the U.S. plasma science effort as a whole. Nonindustrial
   plasma science funding in this country is dominated by OFES, which now
   has a mandate to act as a steward for plasma science. Given this
   domination, the assessment refers to the OFES program and the overall
   U.S. plasma science research effort interchangeably. For the same
   reason, the committee uses the terms plasma science, plasma physics,
   and fusion science interchangeably in this report. It is important to
   note topics that the committee did not directly address and that are
   therefore not included here. The report focuses on the science of
   magnetically confined plasmas and the program- matic strategy for
   long-term progress in this area, but it does not directly address
   inertially confined plasmas (with the exception of a brief mention in
   Chapter 3). The Department of Energy's Office of Defense Programs
   sponsors major inertial-confinement fusion research for stockpile
   stewardship pur- poses. OFES also sponsors a relatively small, and
   complementary, program in inertial fusion driver and target research
   relevant to the energy goal. Although some plasma science issues are
   common to both magnetic and inertial confinement, the programs are
   structured quite differently. Also, this assessment does not directly
   address issues surrounding specific technology development and
   engineering research sponsored by the program (with the exception of a
   brief mention in Chapter 3), because the committee chose to focus on
   elements of the program related to basic plasma physics research. ix x
   PREFACE Although the committee explicitly mentions the International
   Toroidal Experimental Reactor (ITER) only in connection with the 1996
   redirection of OFES, the existence of this international partnership
   was implicit during its deliberations, and international efforts are
   mentioned in connection with the potential for a future burning
   experiment. The committee divided into four groups to facilitate the
   writing of this report, although the full committee participated in the
   discussions, data gathering, and internal review of the full report.
   The four groups were a steering group and three working groups, which
   wrote the three main chapters of the report. The steering group
   consisted of the chair, four senior science and technology policy
   experts, and the leaders of the three working groups. The working
   groups were led by James Drake, Stewart Prager, and Robert Rosner, and
   each was made up of members from both inside and outside fusion
   science. The insiders provided the expertise and had detailed knowledge
   of the history of the fusion program, and the outsiders acted as
   objective reviewers. Short summaries of the five committee meetings are
   found in Appendix A. In September 1999, the committee produced an
   interim report1 on the quality of the science in the OFES. OFES
   requested this interim report so it could meet its obligations under
   the Government Perfor- mance Review Act. The interim report was
   necessarily brief, lacked detailed findings, and was without any
   recommendations or discussion of programmatic issues. Despite such
   shortcomings, its findings serve as the core of the discussion in
   Chapter 4 of this final report. To learn the views of the stakeholders
   in the federal government, the chair held discussions with
   representatives of the Department of Energy, the Congress, the Office
   of Management and Budget, the Office of Science and Technology Policy,
   and the Congressional Research Service. For an excellent in- depth
   analysis of the history of the U.S. fusion program, the committee
   strongly recommends Congress and the Fusion Energy Sciences Program: A
   Historical Analysis.2 The committee would like to acknowledge the
   technical input of Martin Greenwald, Alan Turnbull, Ted Strait, Tony
   Taylor, Frank Waelbroeck, Michael Zarnstorff, Cary Forest, Keith
   Burrell, Edward Synakowski, and William Dorland. It would also like to
   thank Kenneth Gentle for providing the results of his independent
   demographic study of plasma physics faculty members at universities.
   The committee would also like to acknowledge two speakers at the La
   Jolla meeting whose talks helped to lay the foundation for the science
   assessment found in this report: Predhiman Kaw, Institute for Plasma
   Re- search, India, on the international standing of the U.S. fusion
   science program, and Steven Cowley, University of California at Los
   Angeles, on contributions of fusion theory to nonfusion science. The
   committee acknowledges the excellent assistance of the NRC staff,
   including Don Shapero, Joel Parriott, and Kevin Aylesworth. It has been
   a privilege and a pleasure for this committee, a blend of practicing
   fusion scientists, active scientists in related fields, and scientists
   with considerable managerial experience, to get to know fusion research
   at a critical turning point in its evolution. The committee hopes that
   the different per- spectives of the members will stimulate the fusion
   research community to reach out to the broader science community and
   thereby to assume its rightful place in the sun. Charles F. Kennel,
   Chair Fusion Science Assessment Committee 1National Research Council,
   Fusion Science Assessment Committee. 1999. Interim Report. Washington,
   D.C.: National Academy Press. 2Richard E. Rowberg. 2000. Congress and
   the Fusion Energy Sciences Program: A Historical Analysis. Washington,
   D.C.: Congressional Research Service. Acknowledgment of Reviewers This
   report has been reviewed in draft form by individuals chosen for their
   diverse perspectives and technical expertise, in accordance with
   procedures approved by the NRC's Report Review Committee. The purpose
   of this independent review is to provide candid and critical comments
   that will assist the institution in making its published report as
   sound as possible and to ensure that the report meets institu- tional
   standards for objectivity, evidence, and responsiveness to the study
   charge. The review comments and draft manuscript remain confidential to
   protect the integrity of the deliberative process. We wish to thank the
   following individuals for their review of this report: Abraham Bers,
   Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Steven C. Cowley, University of
   California at Los Angeles, Marvin L. Goldberger, University of
   California at San Diego, William Happer, Jr., Princeton University,
   Chuan Sheng Liu, University of Maryland, Roy F. Schwitters, University
   of Texas at Austin, Clifford M. Surko, University of California at San
   Diego, Lilian Shiao-Yen Wu, IBM Corporation, and Ellen G. Zweibel,
   University of Colorado. Although the reviewers listed above provided
   many constructive comments and suggestions, they were not asked to
   endorse the conclusions or recommendations nor did they see the final
   draft of the report before its release. The review of this report was
   overseen by John F. Ahearne, of Sigma Xi, the Scientific Research
   Society, and Duke University, appointed by the NRC's Report Review
   Committee, who was responsible for making certain that an independent
   examination of this report was carried out in accordance with
   institutional procedures and that all review comments were carefully
   considered. Responsibility for the final content of this report rests
   entirely with the authoring committee and the institution. xi Contents
   Executive Summary 1 1 OVERVIEW: ASSESSMENT AND HISTORICAL CONTEXT 9
   Assessment of Quality: Scientific Progress and the Development of
   Predictive Capability, 9 Program Development: Plasma Confinement
   Configurations, 11 Institutional Considerations: Interactions of the
   Fusion Program With Allied Areas of Science and Technology, 12 2
   SCIENTIFIC PROGRESS AND THE DEVELOPMENT OF PREDICTIVE CAPABILITY 14
   Summary, 15 Equilibrium and Heating, 15 Stability, 16 Transport, 16
   Equilibrium and Heating: Designing, Controlling, and Diagnosing a
   Confined Plasma, 17 Tools for Calculating Equilibria, 18 Tools for
   Measuring Equilibrium Pressure and Magnetic and Electric Fields, 19
   Tools for Controlling Plasma Properties, 20 Stability: Predicting
   Operational Behavior, 23 Ideal Stability of Confined Plasmas, 24
   Nonideal Instabilities and Magnetic Reconnection, 26 Density Limits, 29
   Influence of Fast Particles, 30 xiii xiv CONTENTS Transport: Ensuring
   Sufficient Confinement, 32 Empirical Scaling Law Approach, 33
   Development of Tools for Calculating Stability and Simulating Nonlinear
   Microturbulence, 34 Development of Tools for Remote Measurement of
   Fluctuations and Transient Phenomena, 36 Transport Barriers and
   Confinement Control, 37 Evaluation of the Present Understanding of
   Turbulent Transport, 39 Findings and Recommendations, 42 Findings, 42
   Recommendations, 43 3 PLASMA CONFINEMENT CONFIGURATIONS 45
   Introduction, 45 Important Physics Questions Motivating Research With
   Various Configurations, 46 Understand the Stability Limits to Plasma
   Pressure, 46 Understand and Control Magnetic Chaos in Self-Organized
   Systems, 48 Understand Classical Plasma Behavior and Magnetic Field
   Symmetry, 49 Understand Plasmas Self-Sustained by Fusion ("Burning"
   Plasmas), 51 Reactor Design Features Motivating Fusion Concept
   Development, 53 Inertial Fusion Energy Concept Development, 55 Linkages
   With International Programs, 56 Enabling Technologies for Plasma
   Configuration Development, 56 Current Metrics for Fusion Concept
   Development, 57 Findings and Recommendations, 60 Findings, 60
   Recommendations, 60 4 INTERACTIONS OF THE FUSION PROGRAM WITH ALLIED
   AREAS OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY 62 Introduction, 62 What Are the Deep
   Scientific Contributions That Have Impacted Other Physics Fields?, 63
   Stability Theory, 63 Stochasticity, Chaos, and Nonlinear Dynamics, 63
   Dissipation of Magnetic Fields, 63 Origins of Magnetic Fields, 64 Wave
   Dynamics, 64 Turbulent Transport, 65 What Have Been the Fusion-specific
   Contributions of the United States to the World Program?, 65 What Are
   the Future Forefront Areas of Interdisciplinary Research?, 66 Does the
   Field Maintain Leadership in Key Supporting Research Areas?, 71
   Computational Physics, 72 Applied Mathematics, 74 Experimental
   Techniques, 75 CONTENTS xv Has the Field Been Recognized for Asking and
   Answering Deep Physics Questions?, 76 Are Plasma Scientists Well
   Represented and Trained at the Nation's Major Research Universities?,
   76 Creation of Centers of Excellence in Plasma and Fusion Science, 77
   Findings and Recommendations, 79 Findings, 79 Recommendations, 79
   APPENDIXES 83 A Summary of Committee Meetings, 85 B Funding Data, 87
   Total Budget of the Office of Fusion Energy Sciences, 87 National
   Science Foundation/Department of Energy Plasma Physics Partnership
   Funding, 89 Office of Fusion Energy Sciences Funding to Universities,
   89 C The Family of Magnetic Confinement Configurations, 91 The
   Stellarator, 91 The Tokamak, 92 The Spherical Torus, 92 The
   Reversed-Field Pinch, 92 The Spheromak and the Field-Reversed
   Configuration, 92 Other Concepts, 93 D Glossary, 94 E Acronyms and
   Abbreviations, 96 Executive Summary The purpose of this assessment of
   the fusion energy sciences program of the Department of Energy's
   (DOE's) Office of Science is to evaluate the quality of the research
   program and to provide guidance for the future program strategy aimed
   at strengthening the research component of the program.1 The com-
   mittee focused its review of the fusion program on magnetic
   confinement, or magnetic fusion energy (MFE), and touched only briefly
   on inertial fusion energy (IFE), because MFE-relevant research accounts
   for roughly 95 percent of the funding in the Office of Science's fusion
   program. Unless otherwise noted, all references to fusion in this
   report should be assumed to refer to magnetic fusion. Fusion research
   carried out in the United States under the sponsorship of the Office of
   Fusion Energy Sciences (OFES) has made remarkable strides over the
   years and recently passed several important milestones. For example,
   weakly burning plasmas with temperatures greatly exceeding those on the
   surface of the Sun have been created and diagnosed. Significant
   progress has been made in under- standing and controlling instabilities
   and turbulence in plasma fusion experiments, thereby facilitating
   improved plasma confinement-remotely controlling turbulence in a
   100-million-degree medium is a premier scientific achievement by any
   measure. Theory and modeling are now able to provide useful insights
   into instabilities and to guide experiments. Experiments and associated
   diagnostics are now able to extract enough information about the
   processes occurring in high-temperature plasmas to guide further
   developments in theory and modeling. Many of the major experimental and
   theoretical tools that have been developed are now converging to
   produce a qualitative change in the program's approach to scientific
   discovery. The U.S. program has traditionally been an important source
   of innovation and discovery for the international fusion energy effort.
   The goal of understanding at a fundamental level the physical pro-
   cesses governing observed plasma behavior has been a distinguishing
   feature of the program. This feature, a strength of the program, was
   formalized in the 1996 restructuring, with the new emphasis on 1Because
   OFES funding so dominates the funding of plasma science in the United
   States, this report uses the terms "fusion science," "plasma physics,"
   "plasma science," and "the fusion program" interchangeably. 1 2 AN
   ASSESSMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY'S OFFICE OF FUSION ENERGY
   SCIENCES PROGRAM establishing the knowledge base for fusion energy.2 An
   essential tool to unravel the complexities of plasma dynamics is a
   strong theory program. For several decades, the United States has
   played a dominant role in plasma theory. The quantitative detail in
   which experiments are designed and executed in the United States has
   become a benchmark for the rest of the world. However, the close
   interaction between the U.S. and international programs since the 1950s
   makes it difficult to separate the U.S. contributions from those of
   other countries. Mutual reinforcement of theory and experiment, strong
   international leadership, and discovery of fundamental principles are
   hallmarks of a successful scientific enterprise. The committee
   concludes, therefore, that the quality of the science funded by the
   United States fusion research program in pursuit of a practical source
   of power from fusion (the fusion energy goal) is easily on a par with
   the quality in other leading areas of contemporary physical science.
   However, in spite of the high quality of the science being carried out,
   some serious demographic and sociological problems-caused in part by
   programmatic emphasis and in part by organizational struc- tures-must
   be addressed. As outlined in the interim report3 of the committee,
   there is a history of intellectual interchange between the fusion
   plasma community and the broader scientific community. Nevertheless,
   the increasing focus on the fusion energy goal prior to 1996 gradually
   caused the fusion program to become too inward looking and therefore
   intellectually isolated from the rest of science- fusion science was
   not seen as a generator of ideas impacting other scientific
   disciplines. While many of the scientific challenges that must be
   overcome in pursuit of the energy goal are sufficiently important to
   have a potentially broad impact on other branches of science, most
   scientists funded by the program do not actively participate in the
   wider scientific culture. As a result, the flow of scientific
   information out of and into the field is weak. New ideas and techniques
   developed in allied fields are slow to percolate into the program. Nor
   is the high-quality science in the program widely appreciated outside
   the field. Indeed, the broader scientific community holds a generally
   negative view of fusion science. This isola- tion, combined with the
   generally negative perception of the field, is reducing the number of
   universities and laboratories where plasma and fusion science is being
   studied to a degree that endangers the future of plasma science. The
   proportion of the program based on open, competitive, peer-reviewed
   grants is small, which discourages the entry of new talent into the
   field and further increases the isolation. The committee believes that
   a dynamic, outward-looking, science-driven program in which dis-
   coveries are regularly communicated beyond the walls of fusion science
   is essential to alter the outside community's perception of the field.
   A strong case can also be made that a program organized around critical
   science goals will also maximize progress toward a practical fusion
   power source. Scientific discoveries that a decade ago would have been
   unthinkable are the fundamental drivers of program direction at all
   levels (see the third finding in Chapter 2). Thus, scientific discovery
   is inherently coupled with progress toward fusion, and the two should
   not be considered opposing forces. 2In 1996, the goal of the fusion
   program as a schedule-driven energy-development program was altered to
   reflect a longer term strategy for developing and deploying fusion
   energy sources. The central goal of the restructured program is to
   establish the knowledge base needed for an economically and
   environmentally attractive fusion energy source. See Department of
   Energy (DOE), Fusion Energy Advisory Committee. 1996. A Restructured
   Fusion Sciences Program. Washington, D.C.: DOE. 3National Research
   Council, Fusion Science Assessment Committee. 1999. Interim Report.
   Washington, D.C.: National Academy Press. EXECUTIVE SUMMARY 3 PRIMARY
   RECOMMENDATIONS The committee makes seven primary recommendations,
   which address important concerns about the future of the fusion science
   effort. The findings are summarized in this chapter and explained in
   full at the end of Chapters 2, 3, and 4. Those chapters also contain
   secondary recommendations, which are more specific than the primary
   recommendations. Recommendation 1. Increasing our scientific
   understanding of fusion-relevant plasmas should become a central goal
   of the U.S. fusion energy program on a par with the goal of developing
   fusion energy technology, and decision making should reflect these dual
   and related goals. Since the redirection of the fusion program in 1996,
   a greater emphasis has been placed on under- standing the basic plasma
   dynamics underlying the operation of the various confinement
   configurations. The new emphasis on exploring scientific issues has
   been effectively implemented on individual experi- ments. However, at
   the programmatic level, performance goals rather than overarching
   scientific goals continue to act as the primary driver for the
   allocation of resources. (See Chapter 3 for further discus- sion.) This
   emphasis is reflected, for example, in the categorization of
   experiments as concept explora- tion, proof of principle, and
   performance extension, which appears to measure the reactor potential
   of an experiment rather than its scientific merit-there is no parallel
   measure of scientific worth. Given the significant historical impact of
   scientific discovery on the program, the absence of a science-based
   strategic planning process is inhibiting progress. DOE, in full
   consultation with the scientific community, needs to define a limited
   set of important scientific goals for fusion energy science and should
   formulate concrete and specific strategies to achieve each goal. The
   committee understands that such a planning process is under way, but it
   is premature to make a judgement about this new endeavor. The
   accomplishment of the scientific goals should serve as a metric of the
   program's success and should have the same weight as performance, which
   is now the primary measure of progress. Progress in our scientific
   understanding of fusion-relevant plasmas and progress toward fusion
   energy are coupled, and both should serve to assess the program. The
   program planning and budget justification carried out by DOE must be
   organized around answering key scientific questions in fusion-relevant
   plasmas as well as around progress toward the eventual energy goal.
   This recommendation applies to the confinement configuration program
   and to other programs of a more general nature. Public and
   congressional advocacy should insist on progress in science as well as
   progress toward a practical source of fusion power. Recommendation 2. A
   systematic effort to reduce the scientific isolation of the fusion
   research community from the rest of the scientific community is
   urgently needed. Program planning, funding, and administration should
   encourage connectivity with the broad scien- tific community. The
   community of fusion scientists should make a special effort to
   communicate its concepts, methods, tools, and results to the wider
   world of science, which is largely unaware of that community's recent
   scientific accomplishments. Increased connectivity will also facilitate
   the transfer of new ideas and techniques into the program from allied
   fields, enhancing the ability of the program to maximize the rate of
   scientific discovery. There are numerous examples in federally funded
   research programs of formal coordination mecha- nisms having been
   established among related programs in different agencies. In some
   instances this 4 AN ASSESSMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY'S OFFICE OF
   FUSION ENERGY SCIENCES PROGRAM coordination can optimize the use of
   funding. Perhaps more significant, the dialogue among the leaders of
   these government research programs can encourage interactions among the
   various scientific commu- nities, foster joint undertakings, and raise
   the visibility of the discipline as a whole. Recommendation 3. The
   fusion science program should be broadened in terms of both its
   institu- tional base and its reach into the wider scientific community;
   it should also be open to evolution in its content and structure as it
   strengthens its research portfolio. The committee is convinced that the
   opportunity to understand the plasma physics underlying fusion is
   expanding because of the closer connection between theory and
   experiment and the great improve- ments in diagnostics and numerical
   simulation. To enrich the pool of ideas that will feed this progress,
   it will be essential to enlarge the sphere of awareness of the critical
   problems facing the field and to bring in new talent, both individual
   and institutional. The broadening of the fusion science effort can be
   approached in a number of ways. One approach would be to set up
   competitive funding opportunities of sufficient magnitude to elicit
   responses from potential new institutional participants. The creation
   of centers of excellence in fusion science (pro- posed below) and the
   greater involvement of the National Science Foundation in fusion and
   plasma science would also broaden the institutional base of fusion
   science. A larger proportion of fusion funding should be made available
   through open, well-advertised, competitive, peer-reviewed solicitations
   for proposals. Fusion program peer review could involve scien- tists
   from outside the fusion community where appropriate. The evaluation and
   ranking of proposals by panels that include individuals with
   appropriate expertise in allied fields would broaden the intellectual
   reach of the grant review process. Plasma science research that is not
   immediately related to the fusion energy goal should play a more
   influential role in the DOE fusion program. More plasma science could
   be included in DOE's fusion science portfolio by having a program
   element for general plasma science. This program element should award
   individual investigator grants on a competitive, peer-review basis. A
   small fraction of the present DOE program addresses this need (see
   Appendix B), but its role and visibility should be increased. Such
   funding would encourage new interchanges that enrich fusion science. To
   ensure that increasing institutional diversity is a continuing goal,
   the committee recommends that the breadth and flexibility of
   participation in the fusion energy science program be a program metric.
   Recommendation 4. Several new centers, selected through a competitive,
   peer-review process and devoted to exploring the frontiers of fusion
   science, are needed for both scientific and institutional reasons. Many
   of the issues in fusion science are now of sufficient complexity that
   they require closely interacting, critical-mass groups of scientists to
   make progress. For example, understanding the dynamics of plasma
   turbulence and transport requires the development of appropriate
   physical models and compu- tational algorithms for treating disparate
   space- and timescales, as well as complex magnetic geometries,
   efficient programming on massively parallel computing platforms, and an
   understanding of nonlinear physics (energy cascades, intermittency,
   phase transitions, avalanches) and other topics. Tight coupling with a
   parallel experimental effort is required to challenge theoretical
   predictions. No single scientist and no small collaboration of
   practicing scientists has the breadth of knowledge required to tackle
   such large and complex problems. In the area of theory and computation,
   the absence of closely interacting teams of critical mass is inhibiting
   the successful attack on a number of central EXECUTIVE SUMMARY 5
   science issues confronting the fusion research program. The loose
   collaborations that have been periodi- cally established by the program
   have generally not been successful in establishing the close working
   relationships required to address the most challenging topics. The new
   centers ("centers of excellence") could create a new focus on
   scientific issues for the U.S. fusion program. A center could serve as
   a node for a distributed network of close collaborators or it could
   undertake scientific explorations of significant magnitude at one site,
   or it could do both. The centers could marry the expertise and
   approaches of national labs and universities around the country. They
   should have a number of programmatic and structural features so that
   they can play their appropriate role in addressing the critical
   problems of the field. Among these features should be the following: *
   A proposal for a center should have a plan to identify, pose, and
   answer scientific questions whose importance is widely recognized. *
   One size cannot meet all scientific challenges. The committee envisions
   a center comparable in size to the current centers sponsored by the
   National Science Foundation (NSF), which have operating costs of $1
   million to $5 million per year, although the size should ultimately be
   determined by the proposal process. Some centers may need on-site
   experimental facilities, and some may need only computing facilities
   and access to larger national computer centers. * A team of between
   four and six coinvestigators with broad expertise and connections to
   other research groups and laboratories should form the core of the
   center's personnel. This team should be augmented by a similar number
   of temporary research staff (funded, at least in part, by the center)
   and an appropriate number of support staff. * The center should enable
   links to various scientific disciplines, including physics,
   mathematics, and computer science, depending on the problem it is
   focusing on. It should have a plan for bringing practitioners of other
   disciplines from other institutions into the fusion community and
   should make the community's experimental resources more widely
   available. * The institutions housing or participating in such centers
   should make a commitment to add faculty or career staff, as
   appropriate, in plasma/fusion science and/or related areas. * The
   centers should have a strong educational component, featuring outreach
   to local high schools, undergraduate research opportunities, and a
   graduate research program. * Centers should sponsor multidisciplinary
   workshops and summer schools focused on their central problem that will
   bring together students and researchers from various fields and
   institutions. The workshops would aim to bring in new ideas and
   collaborators as well as to disseminate to other fields the results
   they are achieving as they address the fundamental problems of fusion
   science. Potential focus topics for centers include turbulence and
   transport, magnetic reconnection, energetic particle dynamics, and
   materials; other topics would emerge in a widely advertised proposal
   process. Topics such as these are of broad scientific interest in
   allied fields. To build another bridge to allied fields, the DOE should
   cooperate with the NSF in establishing one or more centers addressing a
   topic of general interest in plasma science. The DOE/NSF centers should
   have as a central objective establishing collaborations with scientists
   who have expertise of value to the plasma science and fusion research
   effort. An explicit goal of the centers should be to convey important
   scientific results to the broader scientific community as well as the
   rest of the fusion community. An announcement of opportunity for fusion
   centers of excellence would, by itself, signal to the broader
   scientific community the community's intent to significantly bolster
   the scientific strength of the field. It would be highly desirable for
   other agencies, particularly NSF, to collaborate in one or more fusion
   centers of excellence for reasons of disciplinary and institutional
   diversity as well as to obtain the 6 AN ASSESSMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
   ENERGY'S OFFICE OF FUSION ENERGY SCIENCES PROGRAM benefits of
   interagency collaboration cited in recommendation 3. However, the DOE
   should play a lead role in these centers, not only for reasons of
   administrative clarity but also because its leadership will ensure that
   the impressive capabilities of the fusion energy science community are
   made available to new participants. DOE leadership will also ensure
   that progress in the centers would be communicated throughout the
   fusion community and translated into DOE program plans, to hasten
   progress towards the fusion energy goal. The procedure for awarding
   grants for fusion centers of excellence could do much to remedy the
   isolation of the fusion science community by ensuring that the broader
   scientific community will partici- pate in the institution-building
   effort. The selection process for the centers should feature open, com-
   petitive peer review employing clear, science-based selection criteria.
   The committee believes that the establishment of such centers is
   critical enough to the new science- based approach to fusion energy
   that ways should be found to fund a first center even in a level budget
   scenario. The success of the competition and the quality of the first
   center should guide the decision on launching second or even third
   centers. In other programs, such centers have been effective mechanisms
   for broadening and deepening a scientific area. In the committee's
   view, there is a very strong argument for expanding program funding to
   give fusion centers of excellence a strong and durable foundation.
   Recommendation 5. Solid support should be developed within the broad
   scientific community for U.S. investment in a fusion burning
   experiment. A burning plasma experiment will eventually be
   scientifically necessary and is on the critical path to fusion energy.
   Determining the optimal route to a burning plasma experiment is beyond
   the scope of the committee; rather, the route should be decided in the
   near term by the fusion community. Resources above and beyond those for
   the present program will be required. The U.S. scientific community
   needs to take the lead in articulating the goals of an achievable,
   cost-effective scientific burning experiment and to develop flexible
   strategies to achieve it, including international collaboration. The
   committee agrees with the Secretary of Energy Advisory Board (SEAB)
   report that "... develop- ment both of understanding of a significant
   new project and of solid support for it throughout the political system
   is essential."4 However, since the U.S. fusion energy effort is now
   positioned strategically as a science program, advocacy by the larger
   scientific community for the next U.S. investments in a fusion burning
   experiment now becomes even more critical to developing that support.
   For this reason alone, the scientific isolation of the fusion science
   community needs to be addressed. Recommendation 6. The National Science
   Foundation should play a role in extending the reach of fusion science
   and in sponsoring general plasma science. The mission of OFES,
   following the restructuring of the program in 1996, has been to
   establish the knowledge base in plasma physics required for fusion
   energy, with the result that a substantial number of plasma science
   problems are being explored within the fusion regime that also have
   applicability to allied fields such as astrophysics. For this reason,
   the committee believes that the NSF should begin to play a larger role
   in the solution of these basic plasma science problems. The greater
   involvement of NSF could have an intellectual impact on basic plasma
   science similar to that which it has had on basic 4Department of Energy
   (DOE), Secretary of Energy Advisory Board (SEAB), Task Force on Fusion
   Energy. 1999. Realiz- ing the Promise of Fusion Energy: Final Report of
   the Task Force on Fusion Energy. Washington, D.C.: DOE, p. 2. EXECUTIVE
   SUMMARY 7 research in other scientific disciplines where mission
   agencies like DOE play the main funding role. NSF involvement would
   facilitate linkage to other fields and the involvement of new
   scientists in the program. Recently, NSF and DOE collaborated on a
   small but highly effective program to encourage small laboratory plasma
   experiments and the theoretical exploration of topics in general plasma
   science. The large number of proposals submitted to this program is an
   indication of the need for it. The rationale for the expansion of
   research in general plasma science was well articulated in an earlier
   document of the National Research Council (NRC).5 The NSF/DOE plasma
   science initiative, if operated at a dollar level closer to that
   contemplated in the Plasma Science report (an additional $15 million
   per year for basic experiments in plasma science), can serve several
   important functions: * Stimulating research on broad issues in plasma
   science that have potential applications to fusion and * Enhancing
   interagency cooperation and cultural exchange on the approaches used by
   the two agencies for defining program opportunities, disseminating
   information on research results to the scien- tific community,
   selecting awardees, and judging the outcomes of grants. The optimal
   process for this partnership, if there is sufficient funding (as
   requested in the Plasma Science report), would be an annual
   solicitation of requests for proposals (RFPs). In particular, this
   frequency would give new Ph.D.s the chance to enter the field and stay
   there, since new Ph.D.s are produced by degree-granting institutions
   each year and new graduate students enter school each year. Another
   limitation of the ongoing NSF/DOE program in basic plasma science is
   the absence of any provision for modest experiments in the
   $1-million-per-year class. Historically, neither DOE nor NSF has funded
   plasma science experiments of this scale. For this reason, the
   committee recommends a cooperative NSF/DOE effort to broaden the
   scientific and institutional reach of fusion and plasma research to
   obtain valuable scientific results. Increased NSF funding and a
   stronger focus on fusion and plasma science within NSF would be
   required. As discussed in recommendation 4, NSF could cospon- sor one
   or more centers of excellence in fusion and plasma science.
   Recommendation 7. There should be continuing broad assessments of the
   outlook for fusion energy and periodic external reviews of fusion
   energy science. The committee finds the current pattern of multiple
   program reviews of different provenance to be excessive. A planned
   sequence of external reviews of the U.S. fusion science program should
   replace this pattern. The reviews should be open, independent, and
   independently managed. They should involve a cross section of
   scientists from inside and outside the fusion energy program. The
   manifest independence of the review process will help ensure the
   credibility of the reviews in the eyes of Congress, the Office of
   Management and Budget (OMB), and the broader scientific community. The
   scientific, engineering, economic, and environmental outlook for fusion
   energy should be reviewed every 10 years or so in a process that draws
   on fusion scientists, other scientists, engineers, policy planners,
   environmental experts, economists, and others, from here and abroad.
   These reviews 5 National Research Council, Panel on Opportunities in
   Plasma Science and Technology. 1995. Plasma Science: From Fundamental
   Research to Technological Applications. Washington, D.C.: National
   Academy Press. 8 AN ASSESSMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY'S OFFICE OF
   FUSION ENERGY SCIENCES PROGRAM should assess from multiple perspectives
   the progress in the critical interplay between fusion science and
   engineering in light of the evolving technological, economic, and
   social contexts for fusion energy. Consonant with its charge, the
   committee has not taken up the many critical-path issues associated
   with basic technology development for fusion, nor has it looked at the
   engineering of fusion energy devices and power plants, yet it is the
   combined progress made in science and engineering that will determine
   the pace of advancement toward the energy goal. Moreover, since much of
   fusion science research is undertaken in the expectation that it will
   contribute to the energy goal, regular, formal assess- ment of the
   progress towards fusion energy is one important way in which a fusion
   science program can be made accountable. STRUCTURE OF THE REPORT The
   report is organized into an overview chapter and three working group
   chapters: "Scientific Progress and the Development of Predictive
   Capability," "Plasma Confinement Configurations," and "Interactions of
   the Fusion Program with Allied Areas of Science and Technology."
   Chapter 1 summarizes the general findings of the committee that came
   out of the three working group chapters and committee deliberations. It
   also refers to other reviews of the program since 1996, touches on the
   recent history of the tokamak experimental effort, and mentions briefly
   international efforts to build a fusion reactor, the International
   Toroidal Experimental Reactor (ITER). The first priority of the
   committee was an evaluation of the science being carried out by the
   DOE's OFES program. Chapter 2 of the report examines the science being
   done in the program, both in areas where there is state-of-the-art
   understanding and in areas where further work is needed to achieve the
   predictive capability that will facilitate the design of the optimum
   magnetic container for holding hot fusion-grade plasmas. Chapter 2 is
   the longest chapter of the report since the committee felt an in-depth
   elucidation of the physics was essential to a proper evaluation.
   Readers who want only a summary of the scientific progress may read the
   summary section of the chapter. In Chapter 3 of the report the various
   classes of magnetic container or confinement configuration are
   discussed. The discussion of the devices is organized around four
   scientific topics to illustrate the commonality of the physics issues
   being explored in each class of container. This commonality is too
   often lost when the devices are discussed separately. Enabling
   technologies and metrics are also dis- cussed. Appendix C presents
   paragraph-long descriptions of each of the major confinement concepts.
   Chapter 4 addresses the interaction between the field of fusion and
   plasma science and the larger science, engineering, and technology
   community. Discussed are the deep physics questions that have been
   addressed by the program, including the generic science results that
   have impacted other areas of physics, some of the key contributions of
   U.S. scientists to the international effort, potentially important
   areas of future interdisciplinary research, leadership in the support
   of research areas, and recognition for scientific accomplishments. In
   addition to Appendixes A through C, which were mentioned above,
   Appendix D is a glossary of technical terms and Appendix E lists
   acronyms and abbreviations. 1 Overview: Assessment and Historical
   Context The quest for fusion energy is one of the greatest scientific
   and technological challenges ever attempted, driving the development of
   modern plasma science and of the technology needed to work with one of
   the most hostile experimental environments on Earth. The committee,
   through its three working groups that produced the main chapters of
   this report, studied the science being carried out in the fusion
   program, the various past and current plasma confine- ment
   configurations, and the interaction of the fusion science program with
   allied areas of science and technology. This examination of the
   magnetic confinement plasma research funded by the U.S. fusion program
   and of the standing of this research in the international fusion
   community has led to assessments in three areas: scientific progress,
   the development of plasma confinement configurations, and links to the
   broader scientific community. ASSESSMENT OF QUALITY: SCIENTIFIC
   PROGRESS AND THE DEVELOPMENT OF PREDICTIVE CAPABILITY The fusion
   research community has produced a continuing stream of scientific
   discoveries and techno- logical innovations in pursuit of a practical
   fusion power source (the fusion energy goal). The research problems
   central to contemporary magnetic fusion plasma science-turbulence and
   transport, the limits on the magnetic confinement of plasma energy
   density, and the physics of reacting, self-heated plasmas- are
   extraordinarily challenging. The challenge-physical probes cannot
   survive the intense thermal fluxes in the high-temperature regime of
   interest to fusion research-is a consequence of the strong nonlinearity
   of the plasma medium and its resulting complex and rich dynamics. The
   study of high- temperature plasmas motivated by the fusion goal has
   become a fundamental branch of physics and one that is of great
   intrinsic interest. The broader influence of fusion science is clear
   from its impact on other branches of science, including astrophysics,
   space plasma physics, nonlinear science, optics, and turbulence. Fusion
   research recently passed several important milestones. Weakly burning
   plasmas were cre- ated and confined for the first time, indicating that
   many of the tools have now been assembled for answering the scientific
   questions related to the fusion energy goal. The basic understanding of
   some of 9 10 AN ASSESSMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY'S OFFICE OF
   FUSION ENERGY SCIENCES PROGRAM the dominant instabilities driving
   turbulence has advanced to the point where the transport produced by
   this turbulence can be completely suppressed. Even a decade ago, the
   remote control of small-scale turbulence at the 100-million-degree
   cores of modern plasma fusion experiments would have been unthinkable.
   Yet significant inroads are now being made to surmount this critical
   hurdle of 40 years' standing. Theoretical predictions of fusion plasma
   behavior have led to the design, optimization, and testing of new
   plasma confinement approaches and new ways of controlling the macro-
   and microinstabilities that limit energy containment. The close
   interaction between theory and experiment represents the new face of
   the fusion energy sciences program. A successful scientific enterprise
   develops state-of-the-art research tools, uses these tools to bring
   rigorous closure between experiment and theory, and then innovates. The
   ability to diagnose experi- ments on high-temperature plasmas and
   compare the results with theoretical models and numerical simulations
   has improved markedly over the past two decades and in the committee's
   view is itself an important achievement of the field of fusion science.
   The enhanced ability to bring to closure some of the complex problems
   facing the discipline presages a new period of scientific development
   and supports a science-based strategy for fusion energy. Another
   measure of the quality of a scientific program is the international
   standing of the discipline supported by the program. The U.S. fusion
   program has traditionally been an important source of innovation and
   discovery. A distinguishing feature of the program has been its goal of
   understanding at a fundamental level the physical processes governing
   observed plasma behavior. This feature, a strength of the program, was
   formalized in the 1996 restructuring with the new emphasis on
   establishing the knowledge base for fusion energy. Over the past
   several decades, the United States has played a domi- nant role in
   plasma theory, which is an essential tool required to unravel the
   complexities of plasma dynamics. The quantitative detail in which
   experiments are designed and executed in this country has become a
   benchmark for the rest of the world. The forte of the U.S. program is,
   as was mentioned above, the close confrontation between theory and
   experiment and the development of superior computational physics codes
   for quantitative exploration of novel physical concepts. To assess the
   specific contributions of the DOE's OFES program to the fusion effort
   in general, one must separate the U.S. effort from the broader
   international effort. This is not easy, because there has been close
   interaction between the U.S. and international programs since the
   beginning, in the 1950s. To be specific, U.S. scientists played a major
   role internationally in developing the energy principle for describing
   plasma stability; heating and sustaining currents in plasmas; and
   understanding and control- ling plasma turbulence and transport.
   (Specific examples of U.S. and foreign contributions can be found
   throughout the discussion in Chapter 2 and in Chapter 4, in the section
   devoted to U.S. contributions.) In short, the quality of the science
   that has been deployed in pursuit of the fusion energy goal is easily
   on a par with other leading areas of contemporary physical science.
   Fusion research has mastered the ability to work flexibly with the
   super-high-temperature plasma state in the laboratory. It is impor-
   tant to note that the quality of fusion science is not universally
   appreciated within the broader scientific community, perhaps because
   fusion has been viewed as a directed energy development project rather
   than as a scientific enterprise. Isolation of the researchers inside
   the fusion program from those outside the program is another possible
   cause for the low opinion of fusion science despite its high quality.
   Most scientists funded by the program do not actively participate in
   the wider scientific culture. As a result, the flow of scientific
   information both out of and into the field has weakened. New ideas and
   techniques developed in allied fields are slow to percolate into the
   program. All in all, a half century of research suggests that the
   central scientific barriers to the achievement of fusion energy will
   ultimately be overcome, although it is still not possible to predict
   when sustained fusion energy production will be realized, and much
   scientific and engineering work remains to be done. OVERVIEW:
   ASSESSMENT AND HISTORICAL CONTEXT 11 PROGRAM DEVELOPMENT: PLASMA
   CONFINEMENT CONFIGURATIONS Early in the fusion program a variety of
   containment approaches were pursued in parallel. However, the
   constrained fusion budgets of the past two decades were unable to
   support a diversity of approaches to fusion research, especially in the
   United States. The basic strategy during that time was to build a
   series of tokamak configurations of increasing size, until fusion
   burning became possible. The narrow program focus constrained the range
   of scientific questions that could be pursued but at least ensured
   their study in one configuration. Program decisionmaking emphasized
   empirical machine performance and device-specific science at the
   expense of results of scientific generality. Although this philosophy
   complicated attempts to pin down the answers to scientific questions,
   the ability to produce, confine, diagnose, and understand
   high-temperature plasmas improved significantly. In 1985, the G7
   countries sponsored an international collaboration to design the
   International Toroi- dal Experimental Reactor (ITER), reflecting
   optimism that continued tokamak scale-up would result in a large
   experimental reactor in which burning plasma science and fusion
   engineering issues could be addressed simultaneously. In 1996, Congress
   reduced OFES program funding significantly. Participa- tion in ITER was
   discontinued after the ITER Engineering Design Activity was completed
   in 1998. The remaining international partners are working to reduce the
   cost of the design before deciding whether to proceed without U.S.
   participation. The 1996 congressional action, a roughly $100 million
   cut in funding (see Appendix B), naturally stimulated reexamination of
   the U.S. fusion energy program. Consistent with the new science
   emphasis of the program, the Congress, with support from the community,
   repositioned the fusion program admin- istratively and budgetarily in
   the same category (Function 250) as high-energy and nuclear physics and
   renamed it the Fusion Energy Sciences program. This shift implies that
   program decisions in Fusion Energy Sciences will ultimately be made
   using scientific criteria and standards similar to those in high-
   energy and nuclear physics. The committee believes that it would be
   harmful to the stability and morale of the program if in the near
   future its primary focus were to abruptly shift back to energy
   development. The present study by the National Research Council is one
   of several that followed the 1996 con- gressional action. A report by
   the Secretary of Energy Advisory Board (SEAB)1 was especially con-
   cerned with the relation between the DOE Office of Energy Research
   (OER's) magnetic fusion program and the DOE Defense Programs' (DP's)
   inertial confinement program; the committee has nothing to add to
   SEAB's conclusions in this area since it did not examine the inertial
   confinement program. Where the committee and SEAB comment on similar
   issues, they are in general agreement. Of greater pertinence here is
   the study by the Fusion Energy Sciences Advisory Committee (FESAC) of
   DOE.2 This study, which outlines a detailed program for the next few
   years, has a function different from that of the present study.
   Nonetheless, the committee notes that the broad program goals stated in
   the FESAC plan are generally consistent with a science-based approach
   to fusion. For example, the FESAC plan recognizes that fusion research
   will benefit from the deployment of a variety of plasma confinement
   devices. On the other hand, at a more specific level, the categories of
   device proposed by FESAC for program planning (concept exploration,
   proof of principle, performance extension) continue to emphasize the
   evolution of specific plasma configurations toward a fusion power
   reactor at the expense of an understanding of the cross-cutting
   scientific issues. The FESAC decision criteria thus appear not to
   permit projects of 1 Department of Energy (DOE), Secretary of Energy
   Advisory Board, Task Force on Fusion Energy. 1999. Realizing the
   Promise of Fusion Energy: Final Report of the Task Force on Fusion
   Energy. Washington, D.C.: DOE. 2 Department of Energy (DOE), Fusion
   Energy Sciences Advisory Committee. 1999. Report of the FESAC Panel on
   Priorities and Balance. Washington, D.C.: DOE. 12 AN ASSESSMENT OF THE
   DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY'S OFFICE OF FUSION ENERGY SCIENCES PROGRAM
   significant scale designed primarily to answer scientific questions. At
   this level of program detail, scientific goals are still subordinate to
   directed energy development goals and management conceptions. The
   fusion program has undergone a surprisingly large number of reviews,
   with multiple levels of detail and scope, since the 1995 President's
   Committee on Science and Technology fusion report,3 including the
   present review and the SEAB and FESAC reviews mentioned above. The
   multiple recom- mendations at various levels and the drain on program
   resources motivate primary recommendation 7. In summary, the U.S.
   fusion program no longer concentrates solely on achieving a practical
   tokamak reactor in the shortest time feasible, given budgetary and
   other limitations, but is turning to a less time- pressured examination
   of the key scientific issues and technical options surrounding fusion
   energy. Program planning is moving away from mostly empirical decision
   criteria and toward scientific decision criteria. This new approach
   offers the prospect that rigorous fusion science will rapidly advance
   not only energy goals but science goals as well. However, this prospect
   will not be realized until identifying and answering key scientific
   questions become central to program planning, budget formulation, and
   management philosophy. INSTITUTIONAL CONSIDERATIONS: INTERACTIONS OF
   THE FUSION PROGRAM WITH ALLIED AREAS OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY There
   was a clear history of intellectual exchange between the fusion plasma
   community and the broader scientific community in the early, pioneering
   years of the fusion program. Much of the basic description of plasma
   dynamics was being developed, and many of the ideas were of sufficient
   generality to be widely applicable and accessible. However, in recent
   years the increasing specialization and technical complexity of fusion
   research has sharply reduced the accessibility of the work to the
   broader science community. This trend is evident even though many of
   the topics being explored could have significance for allied areas of
   science. The identification of the general nature of many of the more
   recent scientific results-and, accordingly, their potential
   significance to other branches of science-has not been adequately
   encouraged as a programmatic goal. As a consequence, the previously
   rich inter- change between fusion researchers and other scientists has
   diminished greatly. The present fusion community is relatively isolated
   from the rest of the scientific community, seriously eroding the
   univer- sity base of plasma and fusion science. A further contributor
   to the scientific isolation of the U.S. fusion program is its
   relatively narrow and static institutional base. Although the relative
   allocation of DOE funding among national laboratories, universities,
   and industries arguably is roughly the same in the fusion, nuclear, and
   high-energy areas, the smaller overall funding of the fusion program
   does not support an equally diverse community (see Appendix B for
   representative OFES funding data). The almost negligible funding of
   fusion science by other U.S. government agencies is a contributing
   factor, as was the focus during the 1980s on a tokamak- based,
   directed-energy-development program. Most important, fusion research
   dollars have flowed from the same agency office to a small group of
   universities and national and industrial laboratories that has remained
   relatively stable over several decades. While such long-term and
   sustained support can often be critical to the successful resolution of
   important scientific problems, it can also lead to stagna- tion and
   lack of competition. Institutional concentration and stasis have
   narrowed the scientific base of 3 Executive Office of the President,
   President's Committee of Advisors on Science and Technology, Panel on
   the U.S. Fusion Energy R&D Program. 1995. The U.S. Program of Fusion
   Energy Research and Development. Washington, D.C.: White House.
   OVERVIEW: ASSESSMENT AND HISTORICAL CONTEXT 13 the fusion energy
   science program and have acted to reduce the number of knowledgeable
   scientists from other fields who can contribute to fusion research.
   Funding for "general plasma science" is a small fraction of the total
   of the fusion energy science budget, as shown in Appendix B. Some of
   these funds appear to have been well used; for example, the National
   Science Foundation (NSF) and DOE have continued to collaborate on a
   highly successful but small program to encourage small-scale plasma
   science experiments. In addition, general plasma science has found
   support from the National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA)
   and NSF because of its important applications to solar and space
   science, astrophysics, and geophysics. Industry supports major efforts
   in the plasma processing of semiconductor chips. Although many of the
   problems studied in general plasma science do not strictly pertain to
   the very-high-temperature fusion regime, collabora- tion with general
   plasma scientists is one of the main ways in which fusion scientists
   can interact with the broader scientific community. A firmer
   institutional commitment to general plasma science on the part of
   fusion energy science would build stronger links to a vibrant research
   community that is stimulated by a diversity of research goals. The
   proportion of U.S. fusion funding devoted to competitively
   peer-reviewed grants is relatively small. The peer-review process is a
   natural way to involve a broader scientific community in the research
   decisions of a given field; properly administered, it can stimulate a
   field to evolve a healthy diversity of participants and research
   approaches. The committee is concerned that U.S. fusion energy science
   may have a progressively narrowing demographic base. The replenishment
   of the fusion community in the future depends on the health of its
   university programs today. It is very difficult to count fusion and
   plasma faculty so as to estimate how many students are being trained.
   There is some information on physics, the discipline that gave birth to
   plasma and fusion research. Of a total physics faculty of roughly 1300
   in 25 leading university research departments, only 3 are assistant
   professors in plasma physics. This small number suggests that plasma
   faculty in physics departments are not all being replaced. In addition,
   the small proportion (roughly 40 percent) of physics departments in
   leading research universities that have programs in plasma physics is
   itself a matter of intellectual concern, given plasma's status as the
   fourth state of matter. 2 Scientific Progress and the Development of
   Predictive Capability Early experimental efforts to harness fusion
   energy quickly came up against the complex, nonlinear nature of
   plasmas. More often than not, these experiments ended with the plasma
   splattering against the walls of the containment vessel rather than
   being confined inside the magnetic bottle. Scientific advances were
   needed to produce a high-temperature plasma at 100 million degrees.
   Tools had to be developed to describe plasma equilibrium (the balance
   between plasma pressure and the forces of the confining magnetic
   fields) and plasma stability. Even after significant advances had been
   made on these topics, other fundamental questions remained-how
   large-scale instabilities cause the plasma to break up whereas
   small-scale instabilities cause energy leakage across the magnetic
   field; how an essentially collisionless plasma can be heated hot enough
   for fusion reactions to occur; and how phenomena at both large and
   small scales can be remotely measured with enough accuracy to test the
   understanding of plasma behavior. A measure of the maturity of this
   knowledge base-and, also, of the quality of the science-is the ability
   to predict the performance of experiments from a fundamental
   understanding of the characteristic dynamics of plasmas in the
   laboratory and in nature. Such predictive capability goes beyond simple
   performance metrics such as the energy containment time, temperature,
   or the plasma pressure, which, although important, do not necessarily
   reflect the degree to which the fusion program has broadly impacted
   plasma science and related fields. Predictive capability also permits
   the confident design of future large experiments, perhaps even the
   optimum magnetic container (see Chapter 3 for a more com- plete
   description of the various magnetic configurations being explored
   within the program). The following sections discuss progress in the
   understanding of plasma science and the predictive capability that
   follows from this understanding. The material is presented in three
   categories: equilib- rium, stability, and transport. It must be
   emphasized that while the overview of science issues that follows
   attempts to assess some of the important accomplishments of the program
   as well as the challenges it faces, all areas are not given equal
   treatment. It is simply not possible to cover all of the scientific
   topics of the program in depth. In the interest of addressing at least
   some topics with enough 14 SCIENTIFIC PROGRESS AND THE DEVELOPMENT OF
   PREDICTIVE CAPABILITY 15 detail to convey a sense of the science being
   done, the impact of program decisions on the science, and the
   scientific culture of the program, a few representative areas have been
   selected. One complication in assessing the specific contributions of
   the U.S. Fusion Energy Sciences program to the overall fusion effort is
   the need to separate and compare the U.S. effort and the broader inter-
   national effort. From the very beginning of the program, in the 1950s,
   there has been a close collabora- tion internationally on all aspects
   of magnetic confinement fusion (collaboration on inertial fusion was
   constrained by security issues). Large U.S. facilities have had
   international collaborators and vice versa. These close interactions
   often make it difficult to clearly separate U.S. contributions from
   international contributions. The science in this chapter generally
   refers to activities in which the United States has, at the least,
   played a very significant role. Where foreign programs clearly played
   the dominant role, this is noted. Many of the important experimental
   and theoretical tools developed during the four-decade history of the
   program are now converging to produce a qualitative change in the
   program's approach to scientific discovery. Theoretical models are now
   sufficiently mature to describe much of the complex nonlinear dynamics
   of plasmas. Quantitative comparison with experimental observations is
   beginning to facilitate a first-principles understanding and
   interpretation of the behavior of plasmas. One consequence of the
   emerging scientific understanding of these systems is the development
   of techniques for manipulating turbulence and therefore controlling the
   energy-containment properties of the magnetic bottles. The suppression
   of small-scale turbulence and transport in a 100-million-degree medium
   is an accomplish- ment that is by any scientific standard a significant
   achievement and a sign of the high level of the science generally
   carried out under this program. SUMMARY Significant advances have been
   made in each of the traditional foci of plasma physics research:
   equilibrium, stability, heating, and transport. Over the past decade, a
   high level of predictive capability has been developed in several key
   areas. The program is moving into a new era in which the tight
   integration of theoretical predictions and experimental observations is
   enabling the control of plasma dynamics, including the suppression of
   turbulence and transport. Equilibrium and Heating The theoretical and
   computational tools needed for studying plasma equilibria in complex
   magnetic containers are now well developed and extensively used in the
   design of new experiments and in the analysis of existing experiments.
   A number of techniques, including high-power ion beams and driven waves
   at frequencies from kilohertz to multigigahertz, generally referred to
   as radio-frequency waves, have been developed to heat plasmas and also
   to generate and sustain plasma currents. The basic propagation and
   absorption physics for beams and waves are well understood. These
   techniques are being used to control pressure, current, and flow
   profiles and thus to optimize plasma performance in present-day large
   experiments, but techniques applicable to future high-pressure plasmas
   require further development. Diagnostics for remotely measuring
   important equilibrium-related quantities such as plasma density,
   electron and ion temperatures, and magnetic field are now available in
   major plasma experiments. Tools to measure electric fields and
   associated equilibrium flows, which are increasingly recognized as
   having an important influence on stability and transport, are less well
   developed. For future novel plasma configurations, these measurement
   techniques will have to be extended or new approaches invented. 16 AN
   ASSESSMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY'S OFFICE OF FUSION ENERGY
   SCIENCES PROGRAM Stability Pressure and current in magnetically
   confined plasma are limited by large-scale, ideal (zero resistivity)
   magnetohydrodynamic (MHD) instabilities. Standard tools for calculating
   these stability limits in complex magnetic geometries are widely
   available, and their predictions have been benchmarked with
   observations, aided by mature diagnostics. Dissipative instabilities
   (nonzero resistivity), such as magnetic reconnection, are not as well
   under- stood because their growth rates are low. Consequently, fluid
   drifts and flows can strongly modify the conditions under which these
   instabilities begin to grow. Once reconnection sets in, however, the
   dynamics is better understood, and the critical role of dispersive
   waves acting at small scale-lengths has been identified; similar
   physical processes control magnetic reconnection in magnetospheric and
   astro- physical plasmas. Pressure-driven reconnection, which can limit
   the pressure in magnetic containers below the ideal limit, is
   inherently nonlinear and therefore challenging to model. Single-mode
   evolution is largely understood, but the dynamics of multiple modes,
   their interactions, and the related transport are not. The existence of
   a density limit for plasma stability is a robust feature of
   magnetically confined plasmas and is well described by a simple scaling
   law (for tokamaks). While the final termination of discharges that
   exceed the density limit is described by a mechanism involving edge
   cooling, the apparent increase in transport at the limit is not well
   understood, and a predictive theory has remained elusive. The
   destabilization of plasma waves by energetic alpha particles and the
   resulting transport of these particles and their energy are central
   issues for energy-producing plasmas. Experiments have verified
   theoretical models for stability and for the single-wave nonlinear
   behavior. Learning about the inter- action of energetic particles with
   a broad spectrum of waves and the self-consistent interplay among
   plasma equilibrium, stability, and transport in the presence of strong
   local self-heating requires access to a fully ignited plasma
   experiment. Transport It has been well documented that plasma transport
   is mainly caused by an anomalous process in which the free energy from
   gradients in the density and temperature profiles drives instabilities.
   These instabilities lead to vortices, which in turn cause the ions and
   electrons to wander across the confining magnetic field and eventually
   escape from the container. Anomalous transport of the same sort has
   also been invoked in other plasma systems, ranging from Earth's
   magnetopause to astrophysical accretion disks. Historically, the rate
   of transport and its dependence on plasma parameters were described by
   empirical scaling laws derived from experimental data. While the
   empirical laws were useful for com- paring the performance of different
   machines and for benchmarking the testing of ideas for improving
   confinement, they provided little insight into physical processes.
   Moreover, the scaling laws had to be continually modified as plasmas
   progressively entered new operating regimes. This eroded confidence in
   the strictly empirical approach to describing transport. In place of
   scaling laws, a first-principles physics approach is now being
   developed that treats the detailed dynamics of the microscopic
   turbulence that drives transport. The enormous range of space- and
   timescales and the complexity of the magnetic geometry make the
   numerical simulation of turbulent transport a true "grand challenge."
   Recent key discoveries in plasma transport research include the
   recognition that zonal flow plays a crucial role in determining
   nonlinear saturation and in identifying avalanches and associated fast
   radial propagation of disturbances. An important advance occurred when
   transport barriers (local regions of strongly suppressed transport)
   were observed to spontaneously form at the edge of a tokamak plasma.
   SCIENTIFIC PROGRESS AND THE DEVELOPMENT OF PREDICTIVE CAPABILITY 17
   Following a long and sustained effort to understand this phenomenon, a
   major breakthough occurred recently when these barriers were generated
   in the core of a confined plasma. The formation of these barriers
   marked a paradigm shift in the program, since their existence was a
   sign that turbulence-and hence transport-in high-temperature plasmas
   could be controlled. There is now substantial evidence that these
   barriers are generic, occurring in a variety of confinement devices.
   While experimental data support the idea that transport barriers arise
   because self-generated plasma flow suppresses the local turbulence, the
   actual dynamics of and threshold for barrier formation remain poorly
   understood. A complete understanding will require simulating barrier
   formation in the presence of self-consistently evolving turbulence.
   Direct measurement of fluctuations is required to understand
   turbulence-driven transport. Experi- mental techniques have been
   developed for remotely measuring fluctuations in the temperature and
   density at the length of the ion gyroradius (radius of gyration around
   the magnetic field) or larger. However, fluctuations at the much
   smaller electron-scale lengths have not yet been measured. Also, the
   measurement of fluctuations in the electric potential and the magnetic
   field is difficult. Although many instabilities can be present in
   modern plasma experiments, one particular instability-driven by the ion
   temperature gradient-has been identified as the dominant mechanism for
   ion thermal transport in the core of tokamak plasmas. The nonlinear
   behavior of this instability requires further investigation. In
   addition, agreement between key predictions of the models for this
   instability and experimental observations remains weak. The
   understanding of electron thermal and particle trans- port as well as
   the impact of magnetic perturbations, which are known to be important
   in high-pressure plasmas, also remains poor. Fluid models have advanced
   our understanding of transport at the cool edge of confined plasmas.
   The dominant instabilities here are distinct from those in the core
   region. More focused experiments dedicated to comparing theory and
   simulation models with experimental results are needed to gain
   confidence in the models and to pin down the threshold for the
   formation of the edge transport barrier. EQUILIBRIUM AND HEATING:
   DESIGNING, CONTROLLING, AND DIAGNOSING A CONFINED PLASMA Plasmas at the
   extremely high temperatures and densities at which fusion occurs need
   to be contained in magnetic bottles that can insulate the plasma from
   its cold surrounding wall material. These containers must be "strong"
   enough to hold in the pressure of the hot plasma gas, and their
   magnetic field lines must have "good" topology so that hot plasma
   particles-especially electrons-cannot wander along the lines and
   escape. Typically, the field lines of good containers form closed
   surfaces as they wind through space, the result being that particles
   moving along the field lines cannot easily leave the system. Generally,
   the most desirable containment configurations have large values of the
   parameter , which is the ratio of the pressure of the plasma to the
   "pressure" (actually the energy density) of the confining magnetic
   field. For any given configuration, there is an upper limit on for
   which an equilibrium, or balance of pressures, can exist. Above this
   limiting , the plasma blows apart and strikes the walls of the
   confinement vessel, quenching the discharge. Hence the creation of
   equilibrium is the necessary first step to achieving high-temperature
   plasma containment. A number of techniques, including high-power ion
   beams and driven waves at frequencies from kilohertz to multigigahertz,
   generally referred to as radio-frequency waves, have been developed to
   heat plasmas and also to generate and sustain plasma currents. The
   basic propagation and absorption physics for beams and waves are well
   understood. These techniques are being used in present-day large 18 AN
   ASSESSMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY'S OFFICE OF FUSION ENERGY
   SCIENCES PROGRAM experiments for the control of pressure, current, and
   flow profiles in order to optimize plasma perfor- mance, but techniques
   applicable to future high-pressure plasmas require further development.
   The theoretical and computational tools for studying equilibria in
   complex magnetic bottles are now well developed and extensively used.
   Similarly, highly developed techniques for measuring important
   equilibrium quantities such as the plasma density and temperature and
   the magnetic field are now standard on plasma experiments. Diagnostic
   tools to measure electric fields and associated equilibrium plasma
   flows are, however, less well developed. Tools for Calculating
   Equilibria The theoretical and computational tools for calculating the
   magnetohydrodynamic equilibria of plasmas confined in complex magnetic
   bottles are quite mature. The various equilibrium codes give
   reproducible and verifiable results for the same configuration. These
   codes are routinely used for the design of new experiments, analysis of
   data from present experiments, determination of equilibria for
   stability analysis, and even analysis for real-time feedback control of
   complex plasma shapes. Their robustness and high level of development
   reflect the relative simplicity of the underlying physics, which
   involves only Maxwell equations and the force balance for a conducting
   fluid in a magnetic field. In particular, two-dimensional equilibrium
   codes-for configurations with an axis of symmetry- are highly
   developed, extensively benchmarked against experiments (especially for
   tokamaks, less well so for other symmetric configurations), and widely
   used. Some extensions are still being pursued: for example, allowing
   for the presence of currents outside the last closed magnetic flux
   surface (called the separatrix). Three-dimensional equilibrium modeling
   codes are required for confinement configurations that are not
   axisymmetric. The outstanding example is the stellarator configuration,
   which has coils wound into a helical torus (see Figure 2.1). The
   stellarator does not have simple toroidal symmetry, although it may
   have helical symmetry or some useful form of quasi-symmetry. The state
   of the art in these codes continues to evolve, but they still provide a
   reasonably mature set of tools for plasma modeling and analysis. A
   challenge for the three-dimensional equilibrium codes is to be able to
   represent multiply connected regions, such as stochastic field regions
   (where magnetic field lines fill the volume without forming flux
   surfaces) or magnetic islands. Whether equilibria really exist when
   there are no flux surfaces is a question peculiar to the
   three-dimensional configurations. As long as this issue can be avoided,
   the equilibrium codes and vacuum magnetic field solvers provide the
   basic tools for design of complex three-dimensional stellarator
   configurations. A modest amount of experimental benchmarking has been
   pursued for the stellarator equilibria, and more is anticipated in the
   near future. To date, equilibrium code results and two-dimensional maps
   of the magnetic flux surfaces and their spatial shifts are in good
   agreement. Much of this work has been carried out in Germany as part of
   the Wendelstein stellarator experiments. Not much information has yet
   been obtained at high , where the pressure-driven currents are so large
   that the measured fields are no longer close to the vacuum fields
   produced by external coils. Operation at higher values of is expected
   in the next generation of these experiments. The predictive capability
   of equilibrium codes is contingent on the input of reliable profiles of
   the plasma pressure and current. The current profile can usually be
   satisfactorily obtained from classical calculations for current
   diffusion. Obtaining the pressure profile, on the other hand, requires
   a reliable understanding of plasma transport, which has not yet been
   achieved. Heuristic transport models are available, and these have
   often been adequate for predicting the equilibria to be realized in
   experiments. The equilibrium codes are also used in hindsight to
   interpret experimental data. In this case, the current SCIENTIFIC
   PROGRESS AND THE DEVELOPMENT OF PREDICTIVE CAPABILITY 19 FIGURE 2.1
   Pressure surface of a three-dimensional stellarator equilibrium
   illustrates the complex equilibria that can be studied and manipulated
   to maximize confinement and other properties. Courtesy of M.
   Zarnstorff, Princeton Plasma Physics Laboratory (PPPL). and plasma
   profiles can even be extracted from measurements and applied to
   generate self-consistent equilibria. These solutions are then routinely
   utilized to analyze stability and, recently, to control the plasma with
   real-time feedback. Tools for Measuring Equilibrium Pressure and
   Magnetic and Electric Fields Measurements of the internal pressure and
   the magnetic and electric fields in high-temperature confined plasmas
   are critical to understanding the equilibrium and stability properties
   of these plasmas. Probes are useless for measuring these important
   quantities since they vaporize if inserted into the interior of plasmas
   whose electron temperature is 10 to 30 keV. Thus, the challenge has
   been to invent remote measurement techniques. Very early in the fusion
   program, Thomson scattering techniques were developed to measure the
   electron temperature and density profiles. Later, when time-dependent
   measurements were required to understand macroscopic instability and
   magnetohydrodynamics (MHD), electron cyclotron emission techniques were
   developed to obtain accurate electron temperature measurements with
   high time resolu- tion. Ion temperature measurements are more difficult
   and less widely available. In well-diagnosed experimental facilities,
   these data are provided from measurements of charge exchange between
   high- temperature ions and cold neutral particles. 20 AN ASSESSMENT OF
   THE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY'S OFFICE OF FUSION ENERGY SCIENCES PROGRAM
   Extensive progress has been made over the past decade in developing
   ways to measure the structure of the magnetic and electric fields
   inside magnetically confined toroidal plasmas. Most of this work was
   done for the tokamak configuration but is now being extended to other
   plasma configurations. The magnetic field at the edge of a plasma can
   readily be measured with simple external magnetic probes and loops. In
   the case of relatively cold or short-lived plasmas, the internal
   magnetic field has been measured with magnetic pickup loops inserted
   into the plasma. In general, however, remote measurements are required.
   An example of successful diagnostic development is the Motional Stark
   effect, a remote method that can measure the internal structure of the
   equilibrium magnetic field, at least in plasma configurations where the
   magnetic field is strong. This method measures the polarization of
   light emitted from high- energy neutral hydrogen atoms injected into
   the hot plasma core region. The light is polarized as a result of the
   Stark splitting of the energy levels, caused by the induced electric
   field that the atom experiences in its Lorentz-transformed rest frame.
   Care must be taken to account for contributions from the intrinsic
   electric field in the plasma, which can often be comparable to the
   induced field. Such measurements typically provide spatial resolutions
   of a few centimeters and a time resolution of 5 to 10 ms. The tilt
   angles of magnetic field lines are measured to an accuracy of 0.1 deg.
   This accuracy is sufficient for evaluating the global stability of
   plasmas but not their local stability. The measurements are sufficient
   to confirm the existence of the theoretically predicted "bootstrap"
   current, which is a self-generated current present in weakly
   collisional plasmas. These self-generated currents aid the steady-state
   operation of a number of confinement approaches. With high-temperature
   plasma experiments now being pursued in configurations that have weak
   magnetic fields and small, rapidly evolving plasmas, there is an
   increasing need for new or improved techniques to determine the
   internal magnetic field structure. In addition to the Motional Stark
   effect, techniques that use microwave polarimetry, emission from the
   ablation clouds of injected pellets, Zeeman splitting of energetic
   lithium neutrals, flux surface imaging, and Stark line broadening have
   either already been employed in special situations or are under active
   development. These and other concepts will have to be further developed
   in order to measure the magnetic field in modern high-pressure plasma
   experi- ments. New techniques are also needed to measure the profile of
   the current density in the cold edge region since the stability of the
   edge, which depends sensitively on this profile, is crucial for under-
   standing energy containment. Over the past several years there has been
   an accumulation of evidence that plasma flows, driven by electric
   fields that point perpendicular to the magnetic flux surfaces, can have
   a strong influence on plasma stability with respect to both large-scale
   and small-scale disturbances. These electric fields can be directly
   measured by a beam of heavy ions injected into the magnetized plasma.
   However, because it is expensive, this technique has not been deployed
   in large plasma experiments, where the required energy of the ions
   would be very high. Two alternative methods for electric field
   measurements in large, hot plasmas have been developed. The first
   measures the plasma fluid velocity and then indirectly deduces the
   local electric field in the radial direction from force balance. The
   second method uses a variation of the Motional Stark effect to
   simultaneously solve for the pitch angle of the local magnetic field
   and the local electric field strength, from which the local electric
   field structure can be determined with reasonable accuracy. However,
   the extension of the latter method to plasma configurations with weak
   magnetic fields is problematic and is a topic of ongoing diagnostic
   development. Tools for Controlling Plasma Properties The eventual
   success of any magnetic fusion approach will depend on controlling
   several tightly coupled processes: transport, turbulence, macroscopic
   stability, alpha-particle dynamics, and plasma-wall SCIENTIFIC PROGRESS
   AND THE DEVELOPMENT OF PREDICTIVE CAPABILITY 21 interactions. Their
   control, in turn, requires that one be able to control several plasma
   parameters: density, temperature, and the profiles for pressure,
   current (or magnetic geometry), flow, electric field, and so forth.
   Consequently, the development of techniques for plasma heating and
   control has always been a topic of considerable interest, including
   issues in plasma production, heating, current drive, flow drive, plasma
   stabilization, and the basic plasma physics needed for these
   applications. The most fully developed techniques for heating and
   control use either high-power neutral atomic beams or radio- frequency
   waves (see Figure 2.2), which are injected into the plasma. The basic
   physics of bulk heating and current drive has been established for the
   most common applications of both approaches, but techniques for
   detailed control of pressure and current profiles and applications to
   plasmas with high dielectric constants are still in development. In
   neutral beam heating and current drive, energetic neutrals injected
   across the magnetic field deposit energy and directed momentum in the
   confined plasma. The generation, propagation, and deposition of FIGURE
   2.2 A gyrotron from the DIII-D tokamak experiment at General Atomics
   (GA) in San Diego. A gyrotron is a source of high-frequency radio waves
   for heating electrons. Courtesy of General Atomics. 22 AN ASSESSMENT OF
   THE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY'S OFFICE OF FUSION ENERGY SCIENCES PROGRAM the
   beam energy in the plasma are determined mainly by atomic processes and
   hence are well understood and predictable. Detailed measurements of the
   resultant ion distributions and beam deposition profiles have confirmed
   the models used to describe beam heating, while neutral beam current
   drive techniques have been reasonably confirmed with current profile
   measurements and detailed Monte Carlo deposition calculations.
   Nevertheless, the limitations of neutral beam injection for application
   to the large, high- temperature plasmas expected in fusion reactors
   have spurred work on alternative techniques for heating and control.
   The interaction of radio-frequency waves with magnetized plasmas
   promises a wide range of plasma and fusion applications and yields a
   wealth of challenging scientific issues. The main issues in these
   applications are launching the waves, propagation into the plasma in a
   complex magnetic geometry, absorption of the energy (and possibly the
   momentum) by the plasma, and generation of the nonlinear effects that
   perturb the plasma and alter the wave properties. The propagation of
   radio-frequency waves in magnetized plasmas is arguably one of the most
   quantitative and best-understood branches of plasma science. However,
   collisionless interactions with particles, relevant to wave heating in
   high-temperature plasmas, were not understood in the original studies
   of electromagnetic wave propagation in the 1930s and 1940s. Modern wave
   studies for fusion applications, begun in the 1950s and 1960s, were
   plagued by disappointing results owing to the poor confinement of
   energetic particles. Around the same time, theorists developed an
   understanding of wave-particle interactions (collisionless damping) and
   other kinetic effects. This was followed by a wealth of basic
   experimental work that catalogued a multitude of longitudinal plasma
   waves in warm, magnetized, and nearly collisionless plasmas and
   validated the nonlinear theory of plasma-wave inter- actions. As a new
   generation of large plasma devices with improved confinement was
   deployed in the 1970s and 1980s, tests of wave-plasma interactions were
   carried out at the megawatt power level, con- firming the predictions
   of ion and electron bulk heating. Over the past decade, moreover, the
   use of radio-frequency waves to drive plasma currents at the
   mega-ampere level has been demonstrated at efficiencies consistent with
   theoretical predictions. The applications of radio-frequency waves
   extend beyond bulk heating and current drive to precise and localized
   plasma control. For such applications to be successful, an integrated
   understanding must be acquired of the various aspects of wave laun
